Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 3 Employees’ Records Checks for Child Welfare Agencies

Administrative rules and regulations.

Schedule of fees for fingerprint records check, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Administration, Chapter 290-1-5.

49-5-60.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Center” means a child welfare agency, as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 49-5-12, which is required to be licensed or registered under Article 1 of this chapter.

“Conviction” means a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

“Crime” means any felony; a violation of Code Section 16-5-23 when the victim is a minor; a violation of Code Section 16-12-1; a violation of Chapter 6 of Title 16, excluding the offenses of bigamy or marrying a bigamist; a violation of Code Section 16-4-1 when the crime attempted is any of the crimes specified by this paragraph; or any other offenses committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be one of the enumerated crimes listed in this paragraph.

“Criminal record” means:

Conviction of a crime;

Arrest, charge, and sentencing for a crime where:

A plea of nolo contendere was entered to the charge;

First offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was granted; provided, however, that this division shall not apply to a violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16, relating to controlled substances, or any other offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if it were committed in this state, would be a violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16 if such violation or offense constituted only simple possession; or

Adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on the charge; provided, however, that this division shall not apply to a violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16, relating to controlled substances, or any other offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if it were committed in this state, would be a violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16 if such violation or offense constituted only simple possession; or

Arrest and being charged for a crime if the charge is pending, unless the time for prosecuting such crime has expired pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 17.

“Director” means the chief administrative or executive officer of a facility.

(5.1)

“Emergency temporary employee” means an employee other than a director whose duties involve personal contact between that person and any child being cared for at the facility and who is hired on an expedited basis to avoid noncompliance with staffing standards for centers required by law, rule, or regulation.

“Employee” means any person, other than a director, employed by a center to perform at any of the center’s facilities any duties which involve personal contact between that person and any child being cared for at the facility and also includes any adult person who resides at the facility or who, with or without compensation, performs duties for the center which involve personal contact between that person and any child being cared for by the center.

“Employment history” means a record of where a person has worked for the past ten years.

“Facility” means a center’s real property at which children are received for care.

“Fingerprint records check determination” means a satisfactory or unsatisfactory determination by the department based upon a records check comparison of GCIC information with fingerprints and other information in a records check application.

“Foster care home” means a private home used by a child-placing agency which has been approved by the child-placing agency to provide 24 hour care, lodging, supervision, and maintenance for no more than six children who are unrelated to the foster parent or parents.

“Foster parent or parents” means the person or persons who provide care, lodging, supervision, and maintenance in a foster care home used by a child-placing agency.

“GCIC” means the Georgia Crime Information Center established under Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

“GCIC information” means criminal history record information as defined in Code Section 35-3-30.

“License” means the document issued by the department to authorize the center to which it is issued to operate a facility under this chapter.

(14.1)

“National fingerprint records check determination” means a satisfactory or unsatisfactory determination by the department in accordance with applicable law based upon a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation after a search of bureau records and fingerprints.

“Preliminary records check application” means an application for a preliminary records check determination on forms provided by the department.

“Preliminary records check determination” means a satisfactory or unsatisfactory determination by the department based only upon a comparison of GCIC information with other than fingerprint information regarding the person upon whom the records check is being performed.

“Records check application” means two sets of classifiable fingerprints, a records search fee to be established by the department by rule and regulation, payable in such form as the department may direct to cover the cost of a fingerprint records check under this article, and an affidavit by the applicant disclosing the nature and date of any arrest, charge, or conviction of the applicant for the violation of any law, except for motor vehicle parking violations, whether or not the violation occurred in this state, and such additional information as the department may require.

“Satisfactory determination” means a written determination that a person for whom a records check was performed was found to have no criminal record.

(18.1)

“State fingerprint records check determination” means a satisfactory or unsatisfactory determination by the department in accordance with applicable law based upon a records check comparison of GCIC information with fingerprints and other information in a records check application.

“Unsatisfactory determination” means a written determination that a person for whom a records check was performed has a criminal record.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 822, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1605, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 1993, p. 757, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 333, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-23/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-57/HB 242.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (3). See editor’s note for extent of application. The second 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in paragraph (3), deleted “, relating to simple battery,” following “Code Section 16-5-23”, deleted “, relating to contributing to the delinquency of a minor” following “Code Section 16-12-1”, deleted “, relating to sexual offenses” following “Title 16”, and deleted “, relating to criminal attempt” following “Code Section 16-4-1”. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 54(f)/HB79, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2013 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to paragraph (3) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49(6)/HB 79 will not be given effect in this Code section effective January 1, 2014.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendments to Code sections in this article, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 227 (1999).

49-5-61.
Requirement of separate license and separate director for each new facility.

An applicant for a new license shall have a separate license for each new facility in this state owned or operated by that applicant and shall have a separate director for each such facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 11.

49-5-62.
Records check application for director of new facility; preliminary records check for employees; retention of fingerprints.

Accompanying any application for a new license for a facility, the applicant shall furnish to the department a records check application for the director and a preliminary records check for each employee of such facility that is satisfactory. In lieu of such records check applications, the applicant may submit evidence, satisfactory to the department, that within the immediately preceding 12 months the director received satisfactory state and national fingerprint records check determinations that were satisfactory and each employee received a preliminary records check determination that was satisfactory, or that any employee other than the director whose preliminary records check revealed a criminal record of any kind has either subsequently received state and national fingerprint records check determinations that were satisfactory or has had the unsatisfactory determination reversed in accordance with Code Section 49-5-73. The department may either perform preliminary records checks under agreement with GCIC or contract with GCIC and appropriate law enforcement agencies which have access to GCIC information to have those agencies perform for the department a preliminary records check for each preliminary records check application submitted thereto by the department. Either the department or the appropriate law enforcement agencies may charge reasonable fees for performing preliminary records checks.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention. The time frames set forth in this Code section shall not apply when fingerprints have been retained by the department due to its participation in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 4; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-14/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); in subsection (a), in the first and second sentences deleted “satisfactory” preceding “preliminary records check”, and, in the second sentence deleted “satisfactory” preceding “state and national”, added “that is satisfactory” at the end of the first sentence, and, in the second sentence, inserted “that were satisfactory” and “that was satisfactory” in the middle, and inserted “that were satisfactory” near the end; and added subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-5-63.
Notice of determination; issuance of license; effect of unsatisfactory determination.

After being furnished the required records check application under Code Section 49-5-62, the department shall notify in writing the license applicant as to each person for whom an application was received regarding whether the department’s determination as to that person’s state fingerprint records check was satisfactory or unsatisfactory. If the preliminary records check determination was satisfactory as to each employee of an applicant’s facility and the state fingerprint records check was satisfactory as to the director, that applicant may be issued a license for that facility if the applicant otherwise qualifies for a license under Article 1 of this chapter. If the state or national fingerprint records check determination was unsatisfactory as to the director of an applicant’s facility, the applicant shall designate another director for that facility after receiving notification of the determination and proceed under Code Section 49-5-62 and this Code section to obtain state and national fingerprint records checks for that newly designated director. If the preliminary records check for any employee other than the director revealed a criminal record of any kind, such employee shall not be allowed to work in the center until he or she either has obtained state and national fingerprint records check determinations that are satisfactory or has had the unsatisfactory determination reversed in accordance with Code Section 49-5-73. If the determination was unsatisfactory as to any employee of an applicant’s facility, the applicant shall, after receiving notification of that determination, take such steps as are necessary so that such person is no longer an employee. Any employee other than the director who receives a preliminary records check determination that is satisfactory shall not be required to obtain a fingerprint records check when fingerprints have been retained by the department due to its participation in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, unless such an employee has been designated as a director or as permitted by the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-5-69.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 49; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 5; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-15/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in this Code section, in the fourth sentence, deleted “satisfactory” preceding “state and national” in the middle, inserted “that are satisfactory” near the end, and substituted the present provisions of the last sentence for the former provisions, which read: “Any employee other than the director who receives a satisfactory preliminary records check shall not be required to obtain a fingerprint records check unless such an employee has been designated as a director or as permitted by the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-5-69.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-5-64.
Fingerprint records check; retention.

The department shall transmit to GCIC both sets of fingerprints and the records search fee from each fingerprint records check application. Upon receipt thereof, GCIC shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its records and records to which it has access. Within ten days after receiving fingerprints acceptable to GCIC, the application, and fee, GCIC shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including but not limited to any criminal record, of the state fingerprint records check or if there is no such finding. After a search of Federal Bureau of Investigation records and fingerprints and upon receipt of the bureau’s report, the department shall make a national fingerprint records determination.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 6; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-16/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-5-65.
Determination on the basis of fingerprint records check; revocation of license.

After receiving a Federal Bureau of Investigation report regarding a national fingerprint records check under Code Section 49-5-64, the department shall make a determination based thereon and notify in writing the license applicant as to whether that records check was satisfactory or unsatisfactory. If the national fingerprint records check determination was unsatisfactory as to the director of an applicant’s facility, after receiving notification of that determination, that applicant shall designate another director for such facility for which director the applicant has not received or made an unsatisfactory preliminary or fingerprint records check determination and proceed under the requirements of Code Sections 49-5-62 through 49-5-64 and this Code section to obtain state and national fingerprint records check determinations for the newly designated director. The director may begin working upon the receipt of a satisfactory state fingerprint records check determination pending the receipt of the national fingerprint records check determination from the department. The department may revoke the license of that facility if the facility fails to comply with the requirements of this Code section and Code Section 49-5-63 to receive satisfactory state and national fingerprint determinations on the director or to comply with Code Section 49-5-63 regarding employees other than the director.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 7.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, in the second sentence “49-5-64 and this Code section” was substituted for “49-5-65”.

49-5-65.1.
[Repealed] Employment of persons who have entered plea of guilty or nolo contendere to specified offenses.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-65.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 713, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 12, effective October 1, 2004.

49-5-66.
Separate license and center.

Each center shall be required to obtain a separate license and shall have a separate director for each center.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 8.

49-5-67.
Fingerprint records check application for director of existing facility; preliminary records check for employees; annual license.

As an alternative to the requirements set out in this article pertaining to obtaining preliminary criminal records check determinations through the department for employees, foster parents, and adults residing in a foster care home, but not including directors of centers, centers may obtain GCIC information through local law enforcement agencies. The center shall be responsible for reviewing the GCIC information obtained for the potential employee, or foster parent or other adult residing in the foster care home, and making a written determination that the individual does not have a criminal record as defined in this article. This written determination, together with all supporting documentation received from any law enforcement agency, must be maintained in the center’s file and available for inspection by the department. This satisfactory determination must be made before the employee or foster parent begins any duties for the center. However, where there is an urgent need for an emergency temporary employee to work at a center’s facility in order to avoid immediate noncompliance with staffing requirements, such center may utilize the applicant as an emergency temporary employee after applying for the preliminary records check through the local law enforcement agency and completing the affidavit. In such emergency situations, the director of the center must complete an affidavit, with all supporting documentation attached thereto, stating that the GCIC information has been requested through an identified local law enforcement agency and that the results were not immediately available to the center prior to assigning the employee to work with children at the center’s facility in order to avoid immediate noncompliance with staffing ratios. The affidavit with supporting documentation must be maintained in the center’s file on the individual and available to the department for inspection. The director shall review the GCIC information upon receipt, but in no case shall an emergency temporary employee be permitted to continue working for more than three days without having a satisfactory determination made by the director and entered into the center’s file on the employee with all supporting documentation. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations limiting the extent to which centers are authorized to use emergency temporary employees in accordance with this Code section. Foster parents and adults residing in a foster care home utilized by child-placing agencies shall never be utilized as emergency temporary employees of the child-placing agency. Employees, emergency temporary employees, foster parents, and other adults required to have records checks who are utilized by centers are subject to all other requirements set forth in this article. Where the department has reason to question the validity of the GCIC information or the satisfactory determination made by the center, the department may require the employee, emergency temporary employee, foster parent, or other adult to submit a preliminary criminal records check application through the department together with appropriate fees.

History.

Code 1981, § 45-5-67, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 9; Ga. L. 2004, p. 333, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 13.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 49-5-67 (Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1 and Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1), relating to fingerprint records check, was repealed by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 6, effective July 1, 1987.

49-5-68.
Change of director.

If the director of a facility which has been issued a license ceases to be the director of that facility, the licensee shall thereupon designate a new director. After such change, the licensee of that facility shall notify the department of such change and of any additional information the department may require regarding the newly designated director of that facility. Such information shall include but not be limited to any information the licensee may have regarding preliminary or any fingerprint records check determinations regarding that director. After receiving a change of director notification, the department shall make a written determination from the information furnished with such notification and the department’s own records as to whether satisfactory or unsatisfactory preliminary or state and national fingerprint records check determinations have ever been made for the newly designated director. If the department determines that such director within 12 months prior thereto has had satisfactory state and national fingerprint records check determinations, such determinations shall be deemed to be satisfactory state and national fingerprint records check determinations as to that director. The license of that facility shall not be adversely affected by that change in director, and the licensee shall be so notified.

If the department determines under subsection (a) of this Code section that there has ever been an unsatisfactory preliminary or state or national fingerprint records check determination of the newly designated director which has not been legally reversed, the center and that director shall be so notified. The license for that director’s facility shall be indefinitely suspended or revoked unless the center designates another director for whom it has not received or made an unsatisfactory preliminary or state or national fingerprint records check determination and proceeds pursuant to the provisions of this Code section relating to a change of director.

If the department determines under subsection (a) of this Code section that there have been no state and national fingerprint records check determinations regarding the newly designated director within the immediately preceding 12 months, the department shall so notify the center. The center shall furnish to the department the fingerprint records check application of the newly designated director after the date the notification is sent by the department or the license of that facility shall be indefinitely suspended or revoked. If that fingerprint records check application is so received, unless the department has within the immediately preceding 12 months made a satisfactory state fingerprint records check determination regarding the newly designated director, the department shall perform a state fingerprint records check determination of the newly designated director; and the applicant and that director shall be so notified. If that determination is unsatisfactory, the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section regarding procedures after notification shall apply. If that determination is satisfactory, the department shall perform a national fingerprint records check determination for that director as provided in Code Sections 49-5-64 and 49-5-65. The director may begin working upon the receipt of a satisfactory state fingerprint records check determination pending the receipt of the national fingerprint records check determination from the department. If that determination is satisfactory, the center and director for whom the determination was made shall be so notified after the department makes its determination, and the license for the facility at which that person is the newly designated director shall not be adversely affected by that change of director. If that determination is unsatisfactory, the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply.

The time frames set forth in this Code section shall not apply when fingerprints have been retained by the department due to its participation in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-69

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-5-68

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 10; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-17/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 49-5-68, as enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1, relating to requirement that director of a facility not be subjected to more than one fingerprint check during his tenure, was repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, effective July 1, 1985.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, also redesignated former Code Section 49-5-69 as this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-5-69.
Employment requirements; suspension or revocation of license or criminal penalty for violations.

Before a person may become an employee other than a director of any center after that center has received a license, that center shall require that person to obtain a satisfactory preliminary records check. The center shall maintain documentation in the employee’s personnel file, which is available to the department upon request, which reflects that a satisfactory preliminary criminal records check was received before the employee began working with children. If the preliminary records check for any potential employee other than the director reveals a criminal record of any kind, such potential employee shall not be allowed to begin working until either such potential employee has obtained satisfactory state and national fingerprint records check determinations or has had the unsatisfactory preliminary or fingerprint records check determination reversed in accordance with Code Section 49-5-73. If either the preliminary or state or national fingerprint records determination is unsatisfactory, the center shall, after receiving notification of the determination, take such steps as are necessary so that such person is no longer an employee. Any potential employee other than the director who receives a satisfactory preliminary records check determination shall not be required to obtain a fingerprint records check determination except as permitted in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section.

A license is subject to suspension or revocation and the department may refuse to issue a license if a director or employee does not undergo the records and fingerprint checks applicable to that director or employee and receive satisfactory determinations.

After the issuance of a license, the department may require a fingerprint records check on any director or employee to confirm identification for records search purposes, when the department has reason to believe the employee has a criminal record that renders the employee ineligible to have contact with children in the center, or during the course of a child abuse investigation involving the director or employee.

No center may hire any person as an employee unless there is on file in the center an employment history and a satisfactory preliminary records check or, if the preliminary records check determination revealed a criminal record of any kind as to such person, either satisfactory state and satisfactory national records check determinations for that person or proof that an unsatisfactory determination has been reversed in accordance with Code Section 49-5-73.

A director of a facility having an employee whom that director knows or should reasonably know to have a criminal record that renders the employee ineligible to have contact with children in the center shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-5-69

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1416, § 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 9; Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 11; Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 14; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 49-5-69 as Code Section 49-5-68.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, also redesignated former Code Section 49-5-70 as this Code section.

49-5-69.1.
Fingerprint and preliminary records check for foster homes; notice of results; violations; foster parents known to have criminal records; retention of fingerprints.

No licensed child welfare agency, as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 49-5-12, shall place a child in a foster care home unless the foster parent or parents of the home and other adult persons that reside in the home or provide care to children placed in the home have received a satisfactory preliminary records check determination. Additionally, no child shall continue to be placed in such foster care home unless the foster parent or parents also subsequently receive a satisfactory fingerprint records check determination. A child welfare agency or any applicant for a license for such an agency shall be required to submit to the department a preliminary records check application and a records check application for the foster parent or parents of any foster care home used by the agency and a preliminary records check application for any other adult persons that reside in the home or provide care to children placed in the home. In lieu of such applications, the agency or license applicant may submit evidence, satisfactory to the department, that within the immediately preceding 12 months such foster parent or parents or other adult persons have received a satisfactory fingerprint records check determination or a satisfactory preliminary records check determination.

After receiving or obtaining the fingerprint records check determinations or the preliminary records check determinations, the department shall notify in writing the agency or license applicant as to each person for whom an application was received regarding whether the department’s determinations were satisfactory or unsatisfactory. If any such determinations are unsatisfactory, such homes shall not be used by the child welfare agency as foster care homes.

The department shall have the authority to take any of the actions enumerated in subsection (c) of Code Section 49-2-17 if a licensed child welfare agency or an applicant for such a license violates any provision of this Code section.

An executive director of a child welfare agency that uses a foster care home with a foster parent or parents or other adult persons referenced in this Code section whom the executive director knows or should reasonably know to have a criminal record shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

In addition to any other requirement established by law, the submission of fingerprints shall be a prerequisite to the issuance of a license or authorization for the operation of a foster home or to serve as foster parents as provided in this article. Such fingerprints shall be used for the purposes of fingerprint checks by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention. The time frames set forth in this Code section shall not apply when fingerprints have been retained by the department due to its participation in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-69.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 757, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 409, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 539, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-24/HB 228; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-18/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (f).

Law reviews.

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 258 (1994).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-5-70.
Required cooperation among state agencies; unauthorized use of criminal history record information.

GCIC and law enforcement agencies which have access to GCIC information shall cooperate with the department in performing preliminary and fingerprint records checks required under this chapter and shall provide such information so required for such records checks notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and may charge reasonable fees therefor.

Any person who knowingly and under false pretenses requests, obtains, or attempts to obtain GCIC information otherwise authorized to be obtained pursuant to this chapter, or who knowingly communicates or attempts to communicate such information obtained pursuant to this article to any person or entity except in accordance with this article, or who knowingly uses or attempts to use such information obtained pursuant to this article for any purpose other than as authorized by this article shall be fined not more than $5,000.00, imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-5-70

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, had the effect of redesignating former Code Section 49-5-70 as Code Section 49-5-69.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, also redesignated former Code Section 49-5-71 as this Code section.

49-5-71.
Immunity from liability for centers, state agencies, and employees.

Neither GCIC, the department, any law enforcement agency, nor the employees of any such entities shall be responsible for the accuracy of information nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of information or determination based thereon pursuant to this article.

A center or a child-placing agency, its director, and its employees shall have no liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, or any other claim based upon good faith action thereby pursuant to the requirements of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-5-71

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 757, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, a comma was inserted following “director” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 49-5-71 as Code Section 49-5-70 and former Code Section 49-5-72 as this Code section.

49-5-72.
Supplemental nature of article’s requirements.

The requirements of this article are supplemental to any requirements for a license imposed by Article 1 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-5-72

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 49-5-72 as Code Section 49-5-71 and former Code Section 49-5-73 as this Code section.